Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1103.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 204a. (1) A licensee or registrant may surrender a license or registration issued under this article by delivering to the director the license or registration and a written notice stating that the licensee or registrant surrenders the license or registration. (2) The surrender of a license or registration under this section does not affect the licensee's or registrant's civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the surrender of the license or registration. (3) The surrender of a license or registration under this section does not impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting lawful contract between the licensee or registrant and a consumer.